Maryland, session 2026, HB0120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
14–134.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0120*

HOUSE BILL 120
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
11–239 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT CONSTRUCT A DATA CENTER IN THE STATE.
(C) A UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY NOT APPROVE A
PROPOSAL FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A DATA CENTER IN THE STATE.
Article – Tax – General
11–239.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Data center” means a building or group of buildings used to house
computer systems, computer storage equipment, and associated infrastructure that
businesses or other organizations use to organize, process, store, and disseminate large
amounts of data.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any construction of a data center that has received all required federal, State,
and local permits before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act, with no further
action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and
effect if the General Assembly enacts legislation that requires:
(1) all new data centers to be co–located with a new or existing:
(i) natural gas power generation facility;
(ii) nuclear power generation facility; or
(iii) small module reactor; and
(2) the construction at a co–located power generation facility of additional
power generation capacity that meets or exceeds the data center’s power needs.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.